Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201676-3307
Pipeline carrier; reclamation actions
required within thirty days; exception.

A pipeline carrier shall complete final grading, topsoil
replacement, installation of erosion control structures, seeding, and mulching
within thirty days after backfill except when weather conditions, extenuating
circumstances, or unforeseen developments do not permit the work to be done
within such thirty-day period.

Laws 2012, LB845, § 4.